Hawaii statutes.
§706-606 Factors to be considered in
imposing a sentence. The court, in determining the particular sentence to
be imposed, shall consider:

(1) The nature and circumstances of the offense and
the history and characteristics of the defendant;

(2) The need for the sentence imposed:

(a) To reflect the seriousness of the
offense, to promote respect for law, and to provide just punishment for the
offense;

(b) To afford adequate deterrence to criminal
conduct;

(c) To protect the public from further crimes
of the defendant; and

(d) To provide the defendant with needed
educational or vocational training, medical care, or other correctional
treatment in the most effective manner;

(3) The kinds of sentences available; and

(4) The need to avoid unwarranted sentence
disparities among defendants with similar records who have been found guilty of
similar conduct. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1976, c 92, §8; am L 1981, c 27,
§1; am L 1986, c 314, §15]

Cross References

Imprisonment for murder, see §§706-656 and 706-657.

COMMENTARY ON §706-606

[Section 606 of the Proposed Draft of the Penal Code provided
that a person convicted of murder would be sentenced to an indeterminate term
of imprisonment the maximum length of which would be life or twenty years as
determined by the court. The legislature revised §706-606 and added the
provision for mandatory life imprisonment without parole (but subject to
commutation) now contained in subsection (a). The following commentary is
based on the original proposal.]

The crime of
murder is the most serious offense in the penal law; because of this the Code
departs from the general policy underlying §706-605 and makes murder a non-probationable
offense in all cases.

The flexible
mode of disposition provided by §706-605 is premised on the rationale that,
although most class A felons will, perhaps, be sentenced to an indeterminate
term of imprisonment, no legislative classification can take account of unusual
circumstances or extreme mitigations which would indicate that a sentence to
probation, rather than to imprisonment, is warranted. The case is even
stronger for defendants convicted of less serious offenses. However, in
providing a bar to probation for persons convicted of murder (i.e.,
intentionally or knowingly causing the death of another person), the Code takes
the position that, regardless of the information obtained by pre-sentence
procedure, the court's options ought to be limited to which maximum, life or
twenty years, will be applicable to the convicted defendant's term of
imprisonment. The actual time of release from imprisonment will then be
determined by the board of paroles and pardons, which will have more time and
resources to devote to a more deliberate determination of the defendant's
fitness to return to open society.

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §706-606

When the legislature adopted the Code in 1972, it revised
§706-606 to provide for life imprisonment without the possibility of parole in
the four enumerated cases specified in subsection (a). However, the legislature
provided that upon the Governor's commutation, parole would be possible at the
end of twenty years of imprisonment. Subsection (b) essentially derived from
the Proposed Draft.

The Conference Committee Report specifically provides that: "It
is the intent of your Committee that the term 'peace officer' [see subsection
(a)(i)] includes judges and prosecuting attorneys. It is also the intent of
your Committee that §701-101 of the Penal Code shall apply to prisoners
presently serving sentences of life without parole who are, after twenty years
of imprisonment, subject to the same review as provided in §706-606."
Conference Committee Report No. 2 (1972).

Act 27, Session Laws 1981, eliminated the court's discretion
under subsection (b) to impose a sentence of either life imprisonment with
possibility of parole or twenty years imprisonment. As amended the subsection
requires the court to impose the same indeterminate sentence in all cases.

Act 314, Session Laws 1986, deleted the provisions concerning
sentencing for murder and replaced it with criteria to be considered by a court
in imposing any sentence, including the need to afford deterrence to criminal
conduct and to impose just punishment. Conference Committee Report No. 51-86.

Law Journals and Reviews

Risky Business: Assessing Dangerousness in Hawai‘i. 24 UH
L. Rev. 63 (2001).

Case Notes

Murder contract not element of offense of murder; only
relevant for purpose of sentence enhancement. 807 F.2d 805 (1987).

Not unconstitutionally vague. 751 F. Supp. 853 (1990).

The better rule is to include in indictment the aggravating
circumstances which result in application of statute enhancing the penalty for
the crime committed. 59 H. 625, 586 P.2d 250 (1978).

Subsection (b) not unconstitutional. Judge must impose
sentence of life imprisonment with possibility of parole, but allowed to reduce
it to twenty years if factors or circumstances warrant lesser sentence. 64 H.
193, 638 P.2d 307 (1981).

Sentencing court abused discretion by finding defendant
committed murder by hire. 67 H. 573, 698 P.2d 287 (1985).

Trial court abused its discretion in rigidly applying family
court sentencing guidelines promulgated without legislative authority. 72 H.
521, 824 P.2d 837 (1992).

Sentencing court may properly consider criminal convictions
that occurred subsequent to original illegal sentence when applying §706-606
factors on resentencing. 79 H. 281, 901 P.2d 481 (1995).

Where no evidence that group engaged in or endorsed illegal
activities, insufficient evidence to establish any reasonable correlation
between defendant's association with group and imposition of consecutive prison
sentences under paragraph (1). 81 H. 309, 916 P.2d 1210 (1996).

No abuse of discretion in court sentencing defendant to
extended terms of imprisonment under §§706-661 and 706-662 where, inter alia,
court considered each of the factors enumerated in this section and all the
mitigating factors raised by defendant. 83 H. 335, 926 P.2d 1258 (1996).

The January 1, 1987 repeal of language in subsection (b)
(pre-1986 amendment) authorizing a court to impose a sentence of life
imprisonment with the possibility of parole for murder in cases other than
described in subsection (a) (pre-1986 amendment) did not invalidate any such
sentence imposed prior to the repeal date. 102 H. 282, 75 P.3d 1173 (2003).

A sentencing court may not impose discretionary conditions of
probation pursuant to §706-624(2) unless there is a factual basis in the record
indicating that such conditions "are reasonably related to the factors set
forth in this section" and insofar as such "conditions involve only
deprivations of liberty or property", that they are reasonably necessary
for the purposes indicated in paragraph (2). 103 H. 462, 83 P.3d 725 (2004).

The circuit court's statement regarding defendant's
"extensive criminality": (1) related directly to the history and
characteristics of the defendant and identified the specific facts or
circumstances within the range of statutory factors that the court considered
in imposing a consecutive sentence; and (2) provided the conclusions drawn by
the court after consideration of all the facts that pertain to the statutory
factors, and confirmed for defendant, the public, and the court that the
decision to impose consecutive sentences was deliberate, rational, and fair.
131 H. 94, 315 P.3d 720 (2013).

Where the determination by the intermediate court of appeals
(ICA) that the circuit court, in imposing a consecutive sentence, "likely
concluded" that defendant was dangerous to the safety of the public or
posed an unacceptable risk of re-offending, and that rehabilitation appeared
unlikely, arguably could be read as speculating as to the circuit court's
reasoning, it appeared that the ICA was rather attempting to link the circuit
court's express reasoning to the examples in State v. Hussein, and to the
extent doing so constituted error by the ICA, the error did not warrant
vacating defendant's convictions. 131 H. 94, 315 P.3d 720 (2013).

Seven-day term of imprisonment was not unreasonably related
to factors set forth in this section, considering nature of offense and
circumstances presented by the record. 10 H. App. 381, 876 P.2d 1331 (1994).

Trial court did not abuse its discretion in sentencing
defendant to consecutive terms of imprisonment under §706-668.5 where, taking
into consideration all of the factors set forth in this section, the court
pointed to the high level of cruelty, violence, and viciousness involved in the
commission of the offenses, that most of the offenses took place in front of
defendant's two-year-old son, defendant's lack of remorse, the clear and
present danger defendant posed to complainant and the community, and the poor
prospects for defendant's rehabilitation. 106 H. 365 (App.), 105 P.3d 242
(2004).

Where trial court's rationale for imposing jail time
reflected the factors listed in this section, and the jail time imposed did not
exceed the maximum jail term authorized by §706-663, trial court did not clearly
exceed the bounds of reason nor disregard rules or principles of law or
practice to defendant's substantial detriment in imposing a jail term; thus,
trial court did not abuse its discretion in sentencing defendant to 120 days'
imprisonment. 116 H. 403 (App.), 173 P.3d 550 (2007).

Family court did not abuse its discretion by requiring
defendant to attend domestic violence counseling as a condition of defendant's
probation; where defendant was charged with endangering the welfare of an
incompetent person under §709-905 based on substantial evidence that defendant
assaulted complainant, under §706-624(2), the court was free to impose
discretionary conditions of probation that are reasonably related to the
factors set forth in this section and to the extent that the conditions involve
only deprivations of liberty as are reasonably necessary for the purposes
indicated in paragraph (2). 121 H. 228 (App.), 216 P.3d 1251 (2009).

Court did not abuse its discretion in sentencing defendant to
consecutive terms of imprisonment under §706-668.5 because it considered the
factors set forth in this section; defendant's extensive record and the fact
that defendant caused a lot of harm in the community were specific
circumstances that led the court to conclude that a consecutive sentence was
appropriate. 129 H. 135 (App.), 295 P.3d 1005 (2013).

Cited: 73 H. 81, 829 P.2d 1325 (1992).

Discussed: 78 H. 127, 890 P.2d 1167 (1995); 81 H. 421
(App.), 918 P.2d 228 (1996).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next